Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-141
Order; proceeding to enforce; duty of Attorney General.

Whenever any petition authorized by section 75-140 is filed or is prosecuted by the commission or by its direction, the Attorney General shall prosecute the petition at the request of the commission, and the costs and expenses on the part of the commission of any such prosecution shall be paid out of the appropriations for the expenses of the commission.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 41, p. 1370;

Laws 1993, LB 42, § 14;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 54.